District of Columbia statutes.
1-803.01

Obligation of federal government to make benefit payments.

(a)

In general. —

In accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the Federal Government shall make Federal benefit payments associated with the pension plans for police officers, firefighters, and teachers of the District of Columbia.

(b)

No reversion of federal responsibility to District. —

At no point after the effective date of this chapter may the responsibility or any part thereof assigned to the federal Government under subsection (a) of this section for making Federal benefit payments revert to the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 717, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11011

Cross References

Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Retirement Benefit Replacement Plan, trust assets transfer by the Police Officers and Fire Fighters’ Retirement Fund, the Teachers’ Retirement Fund, and the Judges’ Retirement Fund, interim federal benefit payments, see § 1-903.05.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-903.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-762.1.

Editor's Notes

Reference to New Federal Program for Retirement of Judges of D.C. Courts: Sees 11085 of Title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 730,.